02_Morphology/frh.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%<noun%>	! Noun
%<singular%>    ! Singular
%<plural%>      ! Plural



LEXICON Root

Noun;

LEXICON N-1

%<noun%>:  P1 ;

LEXICON NS-1

%<noun%>: S1 ;

LEXICON P1

%<plural%>:%> #; !"s"

LEXICON S1

%<singular%>:%> #; !"noun_itself"

LEXICON Noun

stylo:stylos N-1 ; ! "pen, pens"
stylo:stylo NS-1 ; ! "pen, pen" 
livre:livres N-1 ; ! "book, books"
livre:livre NS-1 ; ! "book, book"
cinéma:cinémas N-1 ; ! "theater, theaters"
cinéma:cinéma NS-1 ; ! "theater, theater"
professeur:professeurs N-1 ; ! "professor, professors"
professeur:professeur NS-1 ; ! "professor, professor"
chien:chiens N-1 ; ! "dog, dogs"
chien:chien NS-1 ; ! "dog: dog"
éléphant:éléphants N-1 ; ! "elephant, elephants"
éléphant:éléphant NS-1 ; ! "elephant, elephant"
animal:animaux N-1 ; ! "animal, animals"
animal:animal NS-1 ; ! "animal, animal"
cheval:chevaux N-1 ; ! "horse, horses"
cheval:cheval NS-1 ; ! "horse, horse"
journal:journaux N-1 ; ! "newspaper, newspapers"
journal:journal NS-1 ; ! "newspaper, newspaper"
château:châteaux N-1 ; ! "castle, castles"
château:château NS-1 ; ! "castle, castle"
neveu:neveux N-1 ; ! "nephew, nephews"
neveu:neveu NS-1 ; ! "nephew, nephew"
oeil:yeux N-1 ; ! "eye, eyes"
oeil:oeil NS-1 ; ! "eye, eye"
monsieur:monsieurs N-1 ; ! "man, men"
monsieur:monsieur NS-1 ; ! "man, man"
madame:madames N-1 ; ! "woman, women"
madame:madame NS-1 ; ! "woman, woman"
mademoiselle:mademoiselles N-1 ; ! "young woman, young women"
mademoiselle:mademoiselle NS-1 ; ! "young woman, young woman"
billet:billets N-1 ; ! "ticket, tickets"
billet:billet NS-1 ; ! "ticket, ticket"
hibou:hiboux N-1 ; ! "owl, owls"
hibou:hibou NS-1 ; ! "owl, owl"
joujou:joujoux N-1 ; ! "toy, toys"
joujou:joujou NS-1 ; ! "toy, toy"
carnaval:carnavaux N-1 ; ! "carnival, carnivals"
carnaval:carnaval NS-1 ; ! "carnival, carnical"

 
